Utah statutes.
78B-5-609.   Proof of execution when subscribing witness denies or forgets.

If the subscribing witness denies or does not recollect the execution of the writing, its execution may still be proved by other evidence.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

